Wyoming, session 2025, SF0002.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-1-107(a), (b)(intro), (ii),
(h)(intro), (iii) and (j), 23-1-302(p), 23-1-703(c), (g),
(h) and by creating a new subsection (j), 23-1-705(a) and
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
(k), 23-2-101(g), (k) and (m) and 23-2-109 are amended to
read:

23-1-107. Residency for obtaining game and fish
licenses.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, to
qualify for any resident game and fish license, bonus
point, preference point, permit or tag issued under this
act, a person shall be domiciled in Wyoming for not less
than one (1) full year immediately preceding the date the
person applies for the license, bonus point, preference
point, permit or tag and shall not have claimed residency
in any other state, territory or country for any purpose
during that one (1) year period.

(b) Each person applying for a license, bonus point,
preference point, permit or tag under this act shall
establish his own residency status independently or as
provided in this subsection or subsection (g) of this
section. A minor dependent shall qualify as a resident if:

SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
(ii) His noncustodial parent qualifies as a
resident under this act and the minor is or will be
residing in this state with the noncustodial parent during
any portion of the calendar year in which the license,
permit or stamp is to be used or in the case of a bonus
point or preference point the calendar year in which the
bonus point or preference point is to be assigned or
accumulated.

(h) An applicant shall provide proof of residency and
swear to an oath of residency when making application for,
or attempting to purchase, a resident license, bonus point,
preference point, permit or tag under this act. License
selling agents and the department shall consider as
documentary evidence of residency any of the following:

(iii) A proof of residency statement on a form
provided by the department that has been completed and
signed by the applicant. Any active duty member of the
armed forces, his spouse or minor dependent of the active
duty member making application for or purchasing a resident
license, bonus point, preference point, permit or tag shall
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
be required to complete and submit the proof of residency
statement; or

(j) The commission may promulgate rules and
regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative
Procedure Act to ensure that only bona fide Wyoming
residents as defined in this act are issued resident game
and fish licenses, bonus points, preference points, permits
and tags.

23-1-302. Powers and duties.

(p) The commission may, by rule and regulation,
establish a process by which big game licenses, trophy game
licenses and wild bison licenses may be issued by a
competitive raffle and prescribe the manner of payment for
which raffle chances are sold and the amount of payment for
each raffle chance. No more than two (2) licenses for each
big game species and trophy game species and no more than
two (2) wild bison licenses shall be issued under this
subsection. Each license issued for bighorn sheep, moose,
mountain goat, grizzly bear or wild bison through a
competitive raffle shall, when applicable, be counted
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
against any nonresident quota. The five (5) year
restriction imposed on the receipt of a moose or bighorn
sheep license by W.S. 23-1-703(b) or and the lifetime
restriction imposed on the receipt of a grizzly bear,
mountain goat, bighorn sheep, wild bison or moose license
by W.S. 23-1-703(c), and any restriction imposed on the
receipt of a wild bison license by W.S. 23-2-107 shall not
be applicable in any manner to a license issued pursuant to
this subsection. The commission shall issue licenses upon
receipt of the proper license fee by the successful
competitive raffle winner. Nothing in this subsection shall
authorize the issuance of a license to any person whose
privilege to procure, purchase or possess a license has
been suspended pursuant to this act or by operation of law.

23-1-703. Limitation of number of certain licenses;
reservation of certain licenses; reservation of certain
unused licenses.

(c) No person may apply for and receive more than one
(1) cow or calf moose or one (1) ewe or lamb bighorn sheep
license in any consecutive five (5) year period. Except as
provided in this subsection and subsection (f) of this
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
section or by rule of the commission, no person who is
issued a hunting license on and after July 1, 2022 for a
grizzly bear, or for a mountain goat, any moose or antlered
moose, any ram bighorn sheep, any bighorn sheep and any
wild bison, and no person who, on July 1, 2022, is subject
to the five (5) year restriction under this subsection (b)
of this section for a cow or calf moose or a ewe or lamb
bighorn sheep license, shall be eligible to apply for or
receive a hunting license for that particular species in
any future year. The commission may issue hunting licenses
to any person in future years when necessary for wildlife
management purposes to harvest grizzly bear, mountain goat,
ewe or lamb bighorn sheep or cow or calf moose. The
commission may issue hunting licenses to any person to
harvest cow or calf wild bison pursuant to W.S.
23-2-107(f).

(g) In addition to the authority granted under
subsection (b) of this section, The commission may through
rule and regulation develop and implement a preference
point program for nonresident antelope, nonresident deer
and nonresident elk licenses which are limited in quota and
would otherwise be issued through a random drawing. A
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
program established pursuant to this subsection may be
implemented for all or selected hunt areas and may be
applied to all or portions of licenses for any particular
species antelope, deer and elk. The commission may charge
nonresident license applicants a nonrefundable fee to
accumulate preference points under the program as provided
in W.S. 23-2-101(m).

(h) Rules and regulations shall be promulgated by the
game and fish commission to carry out subsections (a)
through (f) and (j) of this section and may be promulgated
as provided in subsection (g) of this section.

(j) Licenses issued under this subsection for
antlered moose and ram bighorn sheep shall be issued
partially through a weighted bonus point random drawing and
partially through a random drawing of all remaining
unsuccessful applicants for that year. The department shall
assign bonus points to each applicant for an antlered moose
or ram bighorn sheep license by multiplying the number of
years the applicant has unsuccessfully applied for an
antlered moose or ram bighorn sheep license times one (1).
The department shall then square an applicant's assigned
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
bonus points to determine the applicant's total entry for
the weighted bonus point random drawing. An applicant's
total number of weighted bonus points shall not accumulate
year to year and shall be recalculated each year based on
the applicant's assigned bonus points. The calculation used
to assign bonus points to an applicant for an antlered
moose or ram bighorn sheep under this subsection shall
include any year the applicant does not apply for an
antlered moose or ram bighorn sheep license, provided in
the case of a resident the applicant pays the fee specified
in W.S. 23-2-101(k), and in the case of a nonresident, the
applicant pays the appropriate fee established by the
commission under W.S. 23-2-101(m). For purposes of
assigning bonus points under this subsection, any
unsuccessful applicant failing to apply for a license, or
pay the applicable fee in lieu of applying, during the
second calendar year shall be considered to be a first year
applicant for any subsequent calendar year in which the
applicant submits a license application for an antlered
moose or ram bighorn sheep. Not less than fifty percent
(50%) of available licenses issued under this subsection
for an antlered moose or ram bighorn sheep within any hunt
area shall be randomly selected through a weighted bonus
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
point drawing where each applicant has a number of entries
equal to the applicant's number of weighted bonus points
until all applicants have been exhausted or until all
available licenses have been issued, whichever first
occurs. After the selections through the weighted bonus
point drawing have been completed within a hunt area, the
remaining licenses available from that drawing and the
licenses available for the random drawing for that hunt
area will be issued through a random selection from among
all applicants in the hunt area who were not selected for
issuance of a license for an antlered moose or ram bighorn
sheep through the weighted bonus point drawing in that hunt
area.

23-1-705. Complimentary licenses; pioneer licenses;
antelope hunt licenses; gunpowder and buckskin hunt
licenses; gratuitous licenses; donated licenses.

(a) At the request of the governor, the commission
shall annually issue up to twenty-five (25) complimentary
hunting and twenty-five (25) complimentary fishing
licenses. Not more than five (5) bighorn sheep, five (5)
moose and five (5) wild bison licenses shall be issued
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
under this subsection. The five (5) year restriction
imposed on the receipt of a cow or calf moose, or ewe or
lamb bighorn sheep or wild bison license by W.S.
23-1-703(b) and (c) 23-1-703(c), and any restriction
imposed on taking of wild bison under commission rule and
regulation shall not be applicable in any manner to a
license issued pursuant to this subsection. Except as
provided under subsection (g) of this section, no
complimentary licenses may be issued at the request of the
appointed commissioners. Immediately upon issuance of any
of these licenses, the commission shall submit to the
secretary of state for maintenance as a public record, the
name and address of each licensee and the type of license
issued.

(k) The holder of any valid big game animal license,
trophy game animal license, any wild bison license or a
female or calf wild bison license may surrender said
license to the department for reissuance to a veteran with
disabilities or a person with a permanent disability who
uses a wheelchair as established by commission rule and
regulation selected and sponsored by a nonprofit charitable
organization providing hunting opportunities to a veteran
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
with disabilities or a person with a permanent disability
who uses a wheelchair. Any license reissued in accordance
with the provisions of this subsection shall be for the
same species, area and license type as the license donated.
The license shall be reissued by the department to a
qualifying person at no fee. Any license donated and
reissued under the provisions of this subsection shall not
be sold, traded, auctioned or offered for any monetary
value and shall not be issued to, or used by, any person
other than a qualifying person under the provision of this
section and in compliance with commission rule and
regulation. Licenses reissued to persons pursuant to this
subsection shall not be subject to residency, drawing or
fee requirements under W.S. 23-2-101 or 23-2-107. The five
(5) year restriction imposed on the receipt of a cow or
calf moose or a ewe or lamb bighorn sheep license by W.S.
23-1-703(b), and the lifetime restriction imposed on the
receipt of a grizzly bear, mountain goat, ram or any
bighorn sheep, any wild bison or any moose or antlered
moose license by W.S. 23-1-703(c) or the restrictions
imposed on a wild bison under W.S. 23-2-107(f) shall not be
applicable in any manner to a license issued pursuant to
this subsection.
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058

23-2-101. Fees; restrictions; nonresident application
fee; nonresident licenses; verification of residency
required; donation of refunded application fees.

(g) In promulgating rules and regulations for the
taking of bighorn sheep and moose, the commission shall not
discriminate between residents and nonresidents regarding
the maturity and horn size of the animals which may be
taken. Nothing in this subsection shall be construed as
prohibiting the commission from issuing a different number
of licenses for residents and nonresidents, from requiring
a bonus point or preference point fee from nonresidents
only pursuant to subsection (m) of this section or from
issuing reduced price ewe and lamb bighorn sheep licenses
as provided in subsection (d) of this section.

(k) Any resident qualified to purchase a moose or ram
bighorn sheep hunting license under subsection (j) of this
section may pay a fee of seven dollars ($7.00) in lieu of
applying for a moose or ram bighorn sheep hunting license.
Payment of the fee for a particular species under this
subsection shall authorize the person to accumulate be
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
assigned bonus points for the purposes of the weighted
bonus point drawing under W.S. 23-1-703(b) 23-1-703(j) for
that year in the same manner as if he had unsuccessfully
applied for a hunting license for that species. Payment of
the fee shall be made in compliance with application dates.

(m) Subject to the provisions of this subsection, as
part of any bonus point program for nonresident ram bighorn
sheep or nonresident antlered moose and any preference
point program for nonresident antelope, nonresident ram
bighorn sheep, nonresident moose, nonresident deer or
nonresident elk, the commission may establish a
nonrefundable fee to be either withheld from the license
fee remitted or submitted separately when application for a
license, bonus point or preference point is made through
electronic licensing, and may also establish a fee to be
paid in lieu of applying for licenses that are limited in
quota. Retention of the established fee or payment of the
fee in lieu of applying shall authorize the person to
accumulate be assigned a bonus point or to accumulate a
preference point for future drawings for licenses that are
limited in quota for the applicable species in accordance
with rules of the commission. The rules may provide for the
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
loss of all assigned bonus points or accumulated preference
points for persons failing to apply or to pay the in lieu
fee in two (2) consecutive calendar years. The fee for any
preference points program under this subsection for
antelope, deer or elk shall be established by rule and
shall not exceed seventy-five dollars ($75.00) per species.
Payment of the fee shall be made in compliance with
application dates. Nothing in this subsection authorizes
the commission to establish or retain a fee for resident
moose or resident ram bighorn sheep license preference
bonus points in addition to the fee established by
subsection (k) of this section or to establish rules for
ram bighorn sheep or moose preference weighted bonus point
random drawings in conflict with the provisions of W.S.
23-1-703(b) 23-1-703(j). For nonresident ram bighorn sheep
and nonresident moose licenses, the commission may
establish by rule a nonrefundable preference bonus point
fee to be withheld from either the license fee remitted or
submitted separately when application for a license or
preference bonus point is made through electronic licensing
and may establish a fee in lieu of making application in an
amount greater than that established under subsection (k)
of this section, but neither fee shall exceed one hundred
SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
fifty dollars ($150.00). Fees established under this
subsection may be set at lower amounts for youth license
applicants.

23-2-109. Multiple applications for limited licenses
prohibited; penalty.

Except as otherwise authorized by law or rule of the
commission, no person shall submit more than one (1)
application for a license for the same big or trophy game
species or for wild turkey, if the issuance of the license
has been limited by the commission. A violation of this
subsection shall be punishable as a high misdemeanor
punishable as provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii), by the loss
of all points then assigned to the person pursuant to W.S.
23-1-703(b) or (g) 23-1-703(g) or (j), and disqualification
in the year of submission for any license for the species
for which the multiple applications were submitted.

Section 2. W.S. 23-1-703(b) is repealed.

SF0002

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0058
Section 3. This act shall apply to all antlered moose
and ram bighorn sheep hunting seasons commencing on or
after January 1, 2029.

Section 4. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement the provisions
of this act for transitioning preference points to bonus
points and establishing a weighted bonus point random
drawing for antlered moose and ram bighorn sheep hunting
seasons not later than January 1, 2029.

Section 5.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective January 1, 2029.

(b) Sections 3, 4 and 5 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
SF0002